Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1558.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Baby Diaper Changing Station Accessibility Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Baby diaper changing station." A table or other device suitable for changing the diaper of a child under three years of age."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617 "Public building." One of the following:(1) A building or appurtenance to a building that is built in whole or in part with public money and is open to the public.(2) A retail store of more than 5,000 square feet that contains a restroom open to the public.(3) A restaurant that has an occupancy of at least 60 persons as determined by the State Fire Commissioner and contains a restroom that is open to the public."Responsible authority." An organization, office or individual responsible for enforcing the requirements of a code or standard or for approving equipment, materials, an installation or procedure."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL OR INTERMEDIATE UNIT."SECRETARY." THE SECRETARY OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY OF THE COMMONWEALTH."Totally renovated." Performing construction that is at least $50,000 and that totally removes all nonstructural interior walls, floor and ceiling finishes, mechanical systems, electrical systems and plumbing fixtures and supply and waste lines.Section 3. Installation of baby diaper changing stations.(a) Changing station installation.--A baby diaper changing station shall be installed and maintained:(1) in each public building with restrooms open and accessible to the public when a restroom is constructed and becomes accessible to the public; or(2) when an existing restroom is totally renovated and 20250HB1558PN2543 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 becomes accessible to the public.(b) Accessibility.--To provide for accessibility, baby diaper changing stations shall be:(1) Installed regardless of the gender for which the restroom is designated.(2) In accordance with the standards for accessible design under 28 CFR Ch. 1 Pts. 35 (relating to nondiscrimination on the basis of disability in state and local government services) and 36 (relating to nondiscrimination on the basis of disability by public accommodations and in commercial facilities).(3) Maintained in a safe and sanitary condition.(c) Signage.--A public building that includes a baby diaper changing station in the restrooms shall provide signage at or near the entrance of the restroom indicating the location of the baby diaper changing station.(d) Prohibition.--This act does not establish a private right of action for failure to comply with this section or rules or regulations issued or promulgated in accordance with this section.Section 4. Exceptions.(a) Waiver.--The responsible authority may grant an exemption from the requirements of this act if at least one of the following is met:(1) The installation would not be feasible.(2) The installation would result in a failure with the standards for accessible design under 28 CFR Ch. 1 Pts. 35 (relating to nondiscrimination on the basis of disability in state and local government services) and 36 (relating to nondiscrimination on the basis of disability by public 20250HB1558PN2543 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accommodations and in commercial facilities).(3) The installation would threaten or destroy the historic significance of a historic property.(b) Applicability.--Section 3 shall not apply to:(1) An industrial building, nightclub, bar or other business that does not permit anyone who is under 18 years of age to enter the premises.(2) A restroom located in a health care facility, if the restroom is intended for the use of one patient or resident at a time.(3) A gym, fitness center, health spa or similar place used for exercise or recreation.(4) A restroom located in a room rented to the public in an inn, hotel, motel or other place of lodging.(5) A RESTROOM LOCATED ON THE PROPERTY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY.Section 5. Penalties.(A) ENFORCEMENT.--The department shall enforce this act in accordance with the following:(1) A first violation of this act shall receive a written notification of the violation from the department and provide the building owner with 90 days to remedy the violation.(2) A second violation of this act shall be subject to a AN ADMINISTRATIVE fine of $1,000.(3) A third violation of this act shall be subject to a AN ADMINISTRATIVE fine of $3,000.(4) Fourth and subsequent violations shall be subject to a AN ADMINISTRATIVE fine of $5,000.SECTION 6. INVESTIGATIONS.20250HB1558PN2543 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) AUTHORIZATION.--IF THE SECRETARY RECEIVES INFORMATION INDICATING THAT THIS ACT MAY HAVE BEEN VIOLATED, THE SECRETARY MAY INVESTIGATE THE MATTER.(B) PERMITTED ACTIONS.--THE SECRETARY MAY TAKE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:(1) ENTER AND INSPECT A PUBLIC BUILDING RESTROOM AT ANY REASONABLE TIME TO CONFIRM COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ACT.(2) PETITION COMMONWEALTH COURT TO ENFORCE ANY SUBPOENA OR ORDER ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(C) FINES.--THE FINES COLLECTED UNDER SECTION 5 SHALL BE USED TO FUND THE DEPARTMENT'S ENFORCEMENT EFFORTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ACT.(D) COMPLIANCE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRESCRIBE THE FORM AND MANNER TO RECEIVE COMPLAINTS REGARDING VIOLATIONS OF THIS ACT. THE INFORMATION REGARDING COMPLAINTS, INCLUDING THE COMPLAINT FORM THAT THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH, SHALL BE POSTED ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT.SECTION 7. REGULATIONS.THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROMULGATE REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS ACT. PUBLICATION OF THE FINAL-FORM REGULATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL OCCUR NO LATER THAN 18 MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 6 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days. AS FOLLOWS:(1) SECTION 7 SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.(2) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT UPON THE PUBLICATION OF THE FINAL-FORM REGULATIONS PROMULGATED UNDER SECTION 7.20250HB1558PN2543 - 5 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829